Massachusetts, session 194th, H4591.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. There shall be a Merrimack River Collaborative to serve as a coordinating
entity to advance meaningful progress to improve water quality in the Merrimack River to
support biodiversity, to halt and reverse the loss of species and habitats, to restore natural
systems, to support climate resilience, ecological health, and a sustainable future, and to work to
make the river swimmable, drinkable, fishable and de-listed from the Commonwealth’s list of
impaired waterbodies.
The geographic scope of the Collaborative shall initially be focused on the mainstem of
the river, including wetlands and estuary, from the southern New Hampshire border to the mouth
of the river. In future years, the Collaborative may consider expanding to include the tributaries
of the Merrimack River in Massachusetts. The Collaborative may support and serve as a liaison
for a similar entity in New Hampshire and develop an interstate compact between New
Hampshire and the Commonwealth.
The Collaborative shall employ methods and strategies to advance the following goals:
of 5

(a) Convene Collaborative members and associated communities and act as an
incubator for emerging collaborative projects
(b) Advance the standardization and increased availability of water quality
monitoring data along the river
(c) Monitor and disseminate information regarding known and emerging pollutants
(d) Prioritize Implementation projects to improve water quality
(e) Identify and support legislation, resources, grants and other funding opportunities
to improve water quality and the overall health of the Merrimack River
The Collaborative shall be managed by an Executive Committee comprised of the
Executive Directors, or their designee, of the following organizations: the Merrimack Valley
Planning Commission, the Northern Middlesex Council of Governments and the Merrimack
River Watershed Council. The Collaborative shall be empowered to create special working
groups as needed. The Executive Committee shall make all final decisions for the Collaborative.
In addition to the members of the Executive Committee, the Collaborative shall consist of
members, or their designees, that may include, but not be limited to:
(a) City or town representation from communities that border the mainstem of the
river:
1) City of Amesbury, Mayor
2) Town of Andover, Town Manager
3) Town of Chelmsford, Town Manager
of 5

4) Town of Dracut, Town Manager
5) Town of Groveland, Town Administrator
6) City of Haverhill, Mayor
7) City of Lawrence, Mayor
8) City of Lowell, City Manager
9) Town of Merrimac, Town Administrator
10) City of Methuen, Mayor
11) City of Newburyport, Mayor
12) Town of North Andover, Town Manager
13) Town of Salisbury, Town Manager
14) Town of Tewksbury, Town Manager
15) Town of Tyngsborough, Town Manager
16) Town of West Newbury, Town Manager
(b) State legislative offices representing the above listed communities
(c) The secretaries of the Executive Office of Energy and Environmental Affairs,
Health and Human Services, and Transportation
(d) The Executive Director of the Massbays National Estuary Partnership
of 5

(e) Directors of non-governmental organizations working in the above listed
communities on issues impacting water quality including, but not limited to:
1) Andover Village Improvement Society
2) The Alliance of Climate and Environmental Stewards
3) Essex County Greenbelt Association
4) Groundwork Lawrence
5) Lowell Parks and Conservation Trust
(f) Presidents of universities in the above listed communities working substantively
on issues impacting water quality including, but not limited to:
1) University of Massachusetts, Lowell
2) Middlesex Community College
3) Northern Essex Community College
(g) Managers of drinking water and wastewater systems that draw from or release
into the Merrimack River
Appointments to the Collaborative shall be confirmed by the Executive Committee not
later than 90 days after the effective date of this act. The chief executive officer of each member
organization shall appoint themselves or a representative to serve as a member of the
Collaborative.
of 5

The Collaborative shall not be a funded entity or a recipient of funds. The Collaborative
may advocate for the funding of projects that benefit the mission of the Collaborative undertaken
by its members. Collaborative members shall not receive compensation from the Collaborative
for their services.
The Collaborative may conduct public hearings to receive testimony and collect data. The
hearings shall be held in geographic locations bordering the Merrimack River.
The Collaborative shall produce an annual report based on the calendar year. The report
shall address accomplishments of the Collaborative and highlight the work of member entities
relevant to the goals of the Collaborative. The report shall also outline forthcoming efforts and
make recommendations. The Collaborative shall submit the annual report, with any proposed
legislation, to the clerks of the Senate and House of Representatives no later than December 31st
of each year.
The first meeting of the Collaborative shall be no later than 90 days after the effective
date of this act.
of 5